Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 28.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1830
Organ and tissue
donations; coroner's access to medical information, medical records, pathology
reports, and the donor's body.

(1) If the coroner
releases any organ or tissue for recovery, the coroner may
request that a blood sample, a sample of catheterized urine, a sample of bile
if the liver is recovered for the purpose of transplantation, a biopsy specimen
in fixative of the organ or tissue procured, and copies of any photographs,
pictures, or other diagrams of the organ or tissue made at the time of recovery
be delivered to the coroner.

(2) A coroner shall have access to medical records, pathology
reports, and the body of the donor following the recovery of any organ or
tissue allowed under section 23-1827 or 23-1828.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 28.